Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.527

Opioid overdose reversal medication bulk purchasing and distribution program.

(1) A health plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents under this chapter that is issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2023, must participate in the bulk purchasing and distribution program for opioid overdose reversal medication established in RCW 70.14.170 once the program is operational.

(2) For health plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2025, a health carrier must reimburse a hospital or psychiatric hospital that bills for the following outpatient services:

(a) For opioid overdose reversal medication dispensed or distributed to a patient under RCW 70.41.485 as a separate reimbursable expense; and

(b) For the administration of long-acting injectable buprenorphine as a separate reimbursable expense.

(3) Reimbursements provided under subsection (2) of this section must be separate from any bundled payment for outpatient hospital or emergency department services.

[ 2024 c 366 s 16; 2021 c 273 s 10.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 366: See note following RCW 71.24.847.

Rules—2021 c 273 ss 7-12: See note following RCW 70.14.170.

Findings—Intent—2021 c 273: See note following RCW 70.41.480.